Georgia, session 2025_26, SB331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating and establishing a joint airport authority for the City of Winder and the
County of Barrow, approved March 25, 1958 (Ga. L. 1958, p. 3087), as amended,
particularly by an Act approved March 28, 1986 (Ga. L. 1986, p. 5519) and an Act approved
March 16, 1989 (Ga. L. 1989, p. 3764), is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SECTION 2.
Any and all assets of the Barrow County Airport Authority shall devolve automatically and
without further action to Barrow County, Georgia. The Board of Commissioners of Barrow
County, Georgia, is authorized to execute any deeds or instruments of conveyance required
S. B. 331
- 1 -

SB 331/FA
to place title of such assets into the name of Barrow County and is authorized to do so in the
name of the Barrow County Airport Authority; provided, however, the Barrow County
Airport Authority shall remain in existence for the limited purpose of transferring assets to
Barrow County, after which the Barrow County Airport Authority shall automatically
dissolve. The obligations of the Barrow County Airport Authority, including but not limited
to leases and liabilities, shall be transferred to and assumed by Barrow County, Georgia, by
such instruments as may be required to maintain the same. The Board of Commissioners of
Barrow County, Georgia, is authorized to execute any such instruments required to transfer
such obligations into the name of Barrow County and is authorized to do so in the name of
the Barrow County Airport Authority; provided, however, the Barrow County Airport
Authority shall remain in existence for the limited purpose of transferring assets to Barrow
County, after which the Barrow County Airport Authority shall automatically dissolve.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 331
- 2 -